Utah statutes.
7-17-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Real estate loan" means any agreement providing for a loan secured by an
interest in real estate in this state containing a residential structure of
not more than four housing units, at least one of which is the primary
residence of the borrower and includes, but is not limited to, agreements
secured by mortgages, trust deeds, and conditional land sales contracts.
(2)  "Borrower" means any person who becomes obligated on a real estate loan
at the time of origination of such loan and includes mortgagors, trustors
under trust deeds and vendees under conditional land sales contracts.
(3)  "Lender" means any person who regularly makes, extends or holds real
estate loans and includes, but is not limited to, mortgagees, beneficiaries
under trust deeds and vendors under conditional land sales contracts and who
regularly require or maintain reserve accounts.
(4)  "Person" includes an individual, a commercial bank, savings bank,
building and loan corporation, savings and loan association, credit union,
investment company, insurance company, pension fund, mortgage company, trust
company, or any other organization making real estate loans.
(5)  "Reserve account" means any account, whether denominated escrow, impound,
trust, pledge, reserve or otherwise, which is established in connection with a
loan secured by an interest in real estate located in this state, whether or
not a real estate loan as defined in this chapter, and whether incorporated
into the loan agreement or a separate document, whereby the borrower agrees to
make periodic prepayment to the lender or its designee of taxes, insurance
premiums or other charges pertaining to the property securing the loan and the
lender or its designee agrees to pay the taxes, insurance premiums or other
charges out of the account on or before their due date.
(6)  "Service charge" means any direct fee imposed in connection with the
administration of a reserve account.
(7)  A loan is "made" when the lender makes its initial disbursement of the
loan proceeds.
